Final source/morphy/foma/AnimHalStem.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Loc +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimHalStem;

LEXICON AnimHalStem  				#Corrected

මිනිස් AnimHalNoun;
වලස් AnimHalNoun;
තපස් AnimHalNoun;
රකුස් AnimHalNoun;
හරක් AnimHalNoun;
තල්මස් AnimHalNoun;


LEXICON AnimHalNoun

+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:්  #;
+N+Nom+Sg+Anim:ා #;
+N+Dat+Sg:ාට #;
+N+Dat+Sg:ාටම #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ෙක් #;
+N+ACC+Indef+Sg:ෙකු #;
+N+Dat+Sg+Indef:ෙකුට #;
+N+Dat+Sg+Indef:ෙක්ට #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Indef:ුන් #;
+N+Nom+Pl:්සු #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Indef:ුන්ට #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #;
+N+Loc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙහි #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගේ #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ාගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගෙන් #;
+N+Voc+Pl+Indef:ුනි #;
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ාත් #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Indef:්සුත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ෙකුත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගේත් #;
+N+Nom+Sg+Anim:ාම #;
